test/src/morphology/V-portw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - pȯrtõ: # Verb 45 'eng /est hoorata/fin' - full paradigm
     pȯrtõ+V+Inf: pȯrtõ
     pȯrtõ+V+Ger: pȯrtõs
     pȯrtõ+V+Sup: pȯrtõm
     pȯrtõ+V+Sup+Ine: pȯrtõmõs
     pȯrtõ+V+Sup+Ela: pȯrtõmõst
     pȯrtõ+V+Sup+Tra: pȯrtõmõks
     pȯrtõ+V+Sup+Abe: pȯrtõmõt
     pȯrtõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pūortõb
     pȯrtõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: pȯrtõt
     pȯrtõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: pȯrtõbõd
     pȯrtõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: pūortiz
     pȯrtõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [pūortizt, pūortiztõ]
     pȯrtõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [pūortizt, pūortiztõ]
     pȯrtõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: pȯrt
     pȯrtõ+V+Cond+Sg3: pȯrtõks
     pȯrtõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: pȯrt
     pȯrtõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: pȯrt
     pȯrtõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: pȯrtõgid
     pȯrtõ+V+Jus+Sg3: pȯrtõg
     pȯrtõ+V+Quo+Sg3: pȯrtiji
     pȯrtõ+V+ActPrfPrc: pȯrtõn
     pȯrtõ+V+PssPrfPrc: pȯrtõd
